Hawaii, session 2026, SB2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that lack of awareness and insufficient enforcement of the State's environmental laws are causing substantial ecological harm in the State. Visitors to the State are often unaware of local laws and regulations protecting the environment.  The legislature further finds that the agencies and departments tasked with enforcing these laws frequently lack the resources to educate the public and penalize violators.  The legislature therefore recognizes the need for a method of informing the public of their obligations to reduce environmental harm without overburdening state agencies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require visitors to the State's airports to view an educational video on local environmental protection laws before accessing state-funded Wi‑Fi services. SECTION 2.  Chapter 261, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§261- Airport Wi-Fi; access; mandatory visitor educational video; environmental protection.  (a) The department shall require each person arriving in the State at an airport with a state-funded Wi-Fi service provided for public use to view a one‑minute educational video on the environmental protection laws and regulations of the State and municipalities before the person is granted access to the Wi‑Fi service.  The Wi-Fi service's login webpage shall include a language selection option requiring each person to select a preferred language for viewing the educational video developed pursuant to subsection (b).  The educational video shall play automatically on the Wi-Fi service's login webpage after the person selects a language and shall be viewed by the person in its entirety before access to the Wi-Fi service is granted. (b) The department shall collaborate with the Hawaii tourism authority under initiatives administered pursuant to section 201B-7(b)(7) to develop the educational video required in subsection (a); provided that: (1)  The contents of the educational video shall include but not be limited to: (A)  The statewide prohibition on the sale and distribution of certain sunscreens pursuant to section 342D-21; and (B)  Municipality-level prohibitions on the sale and use of polystyrene foam food service ware and plastic bags; and (2)  The educational video shall be produced in English and any foreign languages the department deems necessary to make the video accessible to the State's predominant visitor populations, including but not limited to Japanese, Chinese, and Korean. (c) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section. (d) For the purposes of this section: "Person" means an individual using a state-funded Wi-Fi service provided for public use in a state airport. "Wi-Fi" has the same meaning as defined in title 47 United States Code section 1306(a)(15)." SECTION 3.  Section 201B-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The authority shall be responsible for: (1)  Creating a vision and developing a long-range strategic plan for tourism in Hawaii; (2)  Developing destination management action plans for each county; (3)  Promoting, marketing, and developing the tourism industry in the State; (4)  Arranging for the conduct of research through contractual services with the University of Hawaii or any agency or other qualified persons concerning social, economic, and environmental aspects of tourism development in the State; (5)  Providing technical or other assistance to agencies and private industry upon request; [and] (6)  Reviewing annually the expenditure of public funds by any visitor industry organization that contracts with the authority to perform tourism promotion, marketing, and development and making recommendations necessary to ensure the effective use of the funds for the development of tourism[.]; and (7)  Implementing and administering tourism-related initiatives, in collaboration with other public agencies, that are designed to educate visitors on the environmental protection laws and regulations of the State and counties." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development and dissemination of the visitor educational video required pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development of the visitor educational video required pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii tourism authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________